Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1668
Violations; civil penalty.

(1) Any person who violates the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act or an application approval, an approval to operate, a rule, a regulation, an order, or a requirement of the Chief Water Officer under the act may be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars per day for each day the violation continues.

(2) The Chief Water Officer shall bring an action to recover a penalty imposed under this section in a court in the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred.

(3) In determining the amount of the penalty, the court shall consider the degree of harm to the public, whether the violation was knowing or willful, the past conduct of the defendant, whether the defendant has taken steps to cease, remove, or mitigate the violation, and any other relevant information.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 68;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 306.